Privacy Policy
The Short Version:
We only collect personal information when necessary.
We securely store your personal information.
We never sell your information to third parties.
The Long Version:
This privacy policy tells you how we use personal information we collect. By using Werdsmith, you are accepting the practices described in this privacy policy. We reserve the right to make changes to this policy, but any changes to this policy will be posted and changes will only apply to activities and information on a going forward, not retroactive basis.
Collection of Information
We only collect personally identifiable information, like names, email addresses, etc., when voluntarily submitted by our users. The information you provide is used to fulfill your specific request. We currently do not use this data for our mailing list, but we reserve the right to do so in the future if appropriate, and will always give you the option to opt out.
Distribution of Information
We may share information with governmental agencies or other companies assisting us in fraud prevention or investigation. We may do so when: (1) required by law; or, (2) trying to protect against or prevent actual or potential fraud or unauthorized transactions; or, (3) investigating fraud which has already taken place. The information is not provided to these companies for marketing purposes.
Commitment to Data Security
Your personally identifiable information is kept secure. Only authorized employees who have agreed to keep information secure and confidential have access to this information.
Third party services
Werdsmith relies on a handful of third parties to provide crucial services. These third parties never receive personally identifiable information:
Amplitude: We send Amplitude anonymous usage data so that we can see how many people are using the app, how popular particular features are, and track any issues. This is an important part of the process of improving the app. It is not possible to connect this data with your identity, and Amplitude doesn't know who you are.
Privacy policy
.
Sentry: If the app crashes, it sends Sentry an anonymous crash log, so that we can investigate and resolve the issue.
Privacy policy
Google Cloud: If you choose to upload a profile image, it's stored securely in Google Cloud. If you don't use this feature, no data is sent to Google.
Privacy policy
OpenAI: Whenever you request the app to continue writing a piece of your work, we must send a snippet of your work to OpenAI to generate this completion. OpenAI does not know your identity, rather we send them an anonymous ID so that they can check that our users aren't abusing their service. If you do not use this app feature, no data relating to you is sent to them.
Privacy policy
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://amplitude.com/privacy:
Privacy Notice
Table of Contents
1. Introduction
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
5. Customer End User Data
6. International Transfer
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
11. Disputes
12. California Privacy Rights
13. Contact Us
14. Cookies
15. Previous Privacy Version
Last Updated: September 26, 2023
1. Introduction
Amplitude, Inc. ("
Amplitude
," "
we
," or "
us
") is a cloud-based product-analytics platform that helps customers build better products. Amplitude respects the privacy of individuals and is committed to protecting the information of visitors to the website ("
Visitors
") and individuals or entities that register to use the Amplitude products and services ("
Customers
"). This Privacy Notice describes Amplitude’s practices for collecting, storing, using, disclosing, and otherwise processing information in relation to Visitors of the website, amplitude.com, including our Community Forum and Amplitude Academy ("
Website
"), Amplitude’s marketing activities, and Customers accessing and using our products and services (collectively, "
Product
").
Please read the following carefully to understand our policies and practices regarding your information collected through the Website, through your use of the Product, and through our marketing activities. If you do not agree with the below policies and practices, your choice is not to use our Website or register to use our Product, or to unsubscribe from our marketing.
2. What This Privacy Notice Covers
This Privacy Notice covers how we treat Personal Data that we gather about you in the course of our business, including when you access or use our Website or Product and through our or our partner’s events and marketing activities. Specifically, Amplitude is the controller of your Personal Data as described in this Privacy Notice, when it collects personal information from: (i) Visitors to Amplitude’s publicly available Website; (ii) Customers and their employees or other authorized users of their Amplitude instance when registering to use and using the Product; and (iii) when we receive personal information from or about you through our sales and marketing activities or events.
Throughout this Privacy Notice, "Personal Data" means any information that identifies or relates to a particular individual and also includes information referred to as "personally identifiable information" or "personal information" under applicable data privacy laws, rules or regulations.
For clarity, this Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End User Data (as defined below) submitted by our customers to the Product. In those circumstances, Amplitude is processing Customer End User Data on behalf of that customer and that customer is responsible for the collection and use of your data. In addition, this Privacy Notice does not apply to the mobile applications, websites or services offered by our Customers or other third-parties. You should refer to that customer’s or third party’s privacy notice and direct any inquiries to them.
3. Personal Data We Collect And How We Use The Personal Data
3.1
PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT
The Personal Data you provide to us directly
You provide your Personal Data to us when you voluntarily fill in forms on our Website such as when you request a demo or to contact sales. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
You may also share Personal Data with us through our Website when you register for an event or online webinar or training; sign up to receive our newsletter; subscribe to our blog; register to contribute and participate in our Community Forum or use Amplitude Academy; download a white paper or playbook; or complete a survey. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number and the content of your request.
In order to access and use the Product, you are required to register for an account with us. When you register for an account, you may provide Personal Data to us, including first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, country and/or state, phone number, and username and password.
You may also provide Amplitude with your personal information at a marketing event or through marketing activities. This Personal Data may include: first and last name, company name, job title, work email address, work address, phone number and the content of your request.
If you attend an in-person or virtual event or agree to be recorded in a telephone or video meeting, we may record some or all of that event or meeting. For events, we may also document the event by taking photos or interviewing you at the event. We use this information for business and marketing purposes and training purposes.
You may choose to participate in an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit or debit card, in which case you may provide your credit card or other payment details information directly to our third party payment processor. As explained below, Amplitude does not store this information.
The Personal Data we collect from third party sources
Amplitude may obtain Personal Data about you from third parties, including, but not limited to, marketing event organizers, partners, resellers, and public databases and websites.
Service providers
. For example, we may use third party providers of business contact information. The Personal Data provided to Amplitude by these Service providers about you may include your first and last name, company name, job title, business mailing addresses, business email addresses and business phone numbers, and LinkedIn URLs for purposes of delivering relevant Product updates and information, email content, advertisements and events.
Advertising partners.
We receive information about you from some of our service providers who assist us with marketing or promotional services, related to how you interact with our Website, event promotions, advertisements or communications. Amplitude requires that any third party providing us with Personal Data contact information has obtained the information lawfully and has the appropriate consent to share the information with Amplitude.
Google’s API Services.
Amplitude integrates Google’s Application Programming Interface (API) Services to allow users the option of logging into our platform with their Google credentials. If you choose to login to the Amplitude platform with Google’s API services, Google may share with us your email, name, and your unique Google ID so we can identify and authenticate you as a user. We do not share your data with any other parties, other than as may be necessary to provide our services to you. Amplitude’s use of information received from Google’s APIs will adhere to the
Google API Services User Data Policy
.
Targeted Online Advertisements:
We use third party service providers to help us understand our marketing efforts and to reach potential customers across the web. These third parties may use targeting and advertising cookies to track your online activity and across different channels, including our websites, email, and other websites and applications, to understand your interests, to display an advertisement for Amplitude, or email you with a marketing communication for Amplitude.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to, and we are not responsible for, cookies in third party ads. You should check the privacy policies of advertisers and/or ad services to learn more about their use of cookies and your information.
Information We Collect Automatically:
As you navigate through and interact with our Website or Product, we may use cookies, which are small files placed on your computer or mobile device, and web beacons, which are small electronic files located on pages of the Website or in email communications, to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions and events, and patterns. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
We also use cookies to access information when you sign in, store your preferences, interact with certain functionality in the Product, to keep you logged in, and to store a limited amount of behavioral data.
The data automatically collected from cookies and web beacons may include information from your Web browser (such as browser type and browser language) and details of your visits to our Website, including traffic data, logs about your login history, identity confirmation, page views, length of visit and website navigation paths as well as information about your computer and internet connection, including your IP address and connecting software. We collect this data in order to help us provide, support and improve our Website, the Product and the user experience with our Website and Product, and for network and information security purposes. You can learn more about cookies and how we use them
here
.
Additionally, Amplitude may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about our Customers' interactions with the Product in a manner that allows us to reproduce and fix issues and to identify areas of improvement for our Product. Customers can opt out of the use of this software during their use of the Product by contacting us at privacy@amplitude.com.
The information we collect automatically may also include statistical and performance information arising from our Customers’ use of our Product and Visitors to our Website. This type of data will only be used by us in an aggregated and anonymized manner.
3.2
THE WAY AMPLITUDE USES YOUR PERSONAL DATA
We use Personal Data that we collect about you or that you provide to us as is necessary to run our business and to carry out day-to-day business activities. How we use the Personal Data we collect depends in part on how you choose to communicate with us, how you use our Website and/or Product and interact with us, and any preferences you have communicated to us. In general, we use the Personal Data in order to respond to a request from you, to carry out our legal obligations, to fulfill a contract with you, to provide the Product or other services to you, to make improvements to the Product, to protect your vital interests, to provide you with notices and for other purposes with your consent as described below.
We use the Personal Data you provide to us when you fill in forms on our Website to respond to your request, provide requested information, and to contact you about that request. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interest in communicating with you and fulfilling your requests.
We may use your Personal Data to provide the Product to you, including to make improvements to the Product and understand your preferences to personalize your experience, as well as for non-marketing or administrative purposes (such as notifying you of major changes to the Website, the Product or for customer service purposes). Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is in the performance of our contract to provide the Product or other services to you.
We also use the Personal Data you provide to us for the purpose of operating our Website and Product; to detect bugs, report errors and to maintain the quality and safety of our Website and Product; and for ensuring the security and integrity of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this personal information is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of and security of our Website and Product.
For Personal Data that we collect through tracking technologies about your interaction with our Website and Product, we use this information for analyzing the use of the Website and Product in order to improve the quality and design, user experience, and performance of our Website and Product. Our legal basis for processing this type of data is our legitimate interests, namely, to provide you with a better user experience.
For Personal Data we collect through targeted or online advertising cookies, we use this information to display and measure engagement with advertisements across different devices and sites and to serve you with marketing materials.
We may use the Personal Data you provide to us at marketing events, when you register for an online webinar or download a whitepaper for the purpose of offering, marketing and selling products and services to you or to communicate with you about an event. Our legal basis for processing this Personal Data is consent, which you can withdraw at any time.
We may also use any of your Personal Data identified in this Privacy Notice for the purposes of: (i) enforcing our agreements and policies, including Terms of Service or Main Service Agreement, (ii) protecting or defending Amplitude’s legal rights; (iv) protecting your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person; or (v) complying with a legal obligation.
We may use your Personal Data for any other business purpose stated when collecting your Personal Data or as otherwise set forth in applicable data privacy laws.
We will not collect additional categories of Personal Data or use the Personal Data we collect for materially different, unrelated, or incompatible purposes without providing you notice.
As noted in the list above, we may communicate with you if you’ve provided us the means to do so. For example, if you’ve given us your email address, we may send you promotional email offers or email you about your use of the Product or Website. Also, we may receive a confirmation when you open an email from us, which helps us improve our Website and Product. If you do not want to receive communications from us, you can unsubscribe from marketing communications or email us with your preferences at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
3.3 LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA FOR EEA, UK, AND SWISS VISITORS AND CUSTOMERS
If you are an individual in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), United Kingdom, Switzerland, or another relevant jurisdiction, we collect and process Personal Data about you only where we have a legal basis or bases for doing so under applicable laws. The legal bases depend on how you use the Website and/or Product, the Product your organization has purchased or uses, how you choose to interact and communicate with Amplitude’s Website and Product, and whether you attend Amplitude events. However, we will collect Personal Data only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you and we will endeavor to make that clear at collection.
4. When Amplitude Discloses Personal Data
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us as described below.
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us to our subsidiaries and affiliates.
We may share your Personal Data collected from you as described in this Privacy Notice with third-party service providers who need to access the Personal Data in order to perform services on behalf of Amplitude, such as processing or storing such information, securing our Website or Product, or providing analytics services on our behalf. The third-party service providers are limited to using the Personal Data solely to provide the services to us and are bound by contractual obligations to keep Personal Data confidential and secure and to use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
If you are part of an Amplitude program that allows you to pay fees with a credit card or debit card and you choose to pay such fees with a credit card or debit card, your credit card or debit card information is provided directly to our third-party payment processor, Stripe, to process the payments. The payment information is transmitted directly via an encrypted connection to Stripe. Stripe uses, processes and stores your Personal Data and payment information in accordance with Stripe’s privacy policy available at stripe.com/us/privacy. Amplitude does not collect or store your payment information. Stripe maintains that it is PCI compliant and you can learn more about Stripe’s security measures available at stripe.com/help/security.
We may share your Personal Data if we believe disclosure is necessary to comply with applicable laws, regulations, respond to a court order, subpoena or a government request (such as a search warrant). If a government request or other legal process requires Amplitude to disclose your personal data, then Amplitude will use reasonable efforts to provide you with prior notification of the disclosure unless Amplitude is prohibited by law from doing so.
Amplitude also reserves the right to disclose your Personal Data that Amplitude believes, in good faith, is appropriate or necessary to: (i) enforce our agreements and policies, including for billing and collection purposes, (ii) protect the security or integrity of the Website or Product; or (iii) protect or defend Amplitude’s legal rights.
In the event that Amplitude is acquired by or merged with a third party entity, we reserve the right, in any of these circumstances, to transfer or assign your Personal Data as part of such merger, acquisition, sale, or other change of control. In the unlikely event of our bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, receivership, or assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the application of laws or equitable principles affecting creditors rights generally, we may not be able to control how your personal information is treated, transferred, or used.
Amplitude may disclose anonymized and/or aggregated information about Visitors to the Website or our Customers’ use of the Product that does not identify any individual.
Amplitude makes available our Community Forum and other resources or materials where you may post user generated content. The information you choose to post is publicly available and may be read and collected by others that visit these sections of the Website. Except for the details in your profile (e.g., username), the categories of data disclosed in these circumstances will depend on what information you choose to provide.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data to third-party business partners at your direction, if you access or request contact from the third-party business partners through the Product or Website or at a marketing event.
Amplitude may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide to us for any purpose disclosed by us when we collect the information or with your consent, such as advertising or marketing providers.
5. Customer End User Data
This Privacy Notice does not apply to Customer End Users, Customer End User Data or Customer Applications.
With respect to the Personal Data collected by our Customers and submitted to the Amplitude platform, Amplitude is a processor and only processes such Personal Data in accordance with the instructions of our Customers. Our Customers may integrate into their mobile applications, websites or other services (collectively, "
Customer Applications
") certain aspects of our Product in order to understand how their own users ("
Customer End Users
") engage with the Customer Applications ("
Customer End User Data
").
Our Customers, not Amplitude, choose the type of Customer End User Data collected by Customer Applications, and submitted and processed through our Customers’ use of the Products. We process the Customer End User Data only according to the instructions of Customers and our legal obligations with respect to the Customer End User Data is set forth in the agreement between us and our Customers. The collection of Customer End User Data through Customer Applications is governed by our Customers’ privacy policies, and if you are a Customer End User then you should review the Customer’s privacy policy to learn more about the Customer’s data handling practices.
While Amplitude recognizes that an individual has the right to access, delete and amend the data collected about that individual, Amplitude only has a relationship with our Customers and does not interact with the Customer End Users. As such, if you are a Customer End User and you would like to access, amend or delete your data, you need to contact the Customer directly with your request which Customer may process. Amplitude will respond within a reasonable period of time to any such request or assistance requested by our Customer.
Amplitude only retains the Customer End User Data we process on behalf of our Customers for as long as necessary to provide the Product to our Customers or as required to comply with legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce any agreement.
6. International Transfer
By interacting with the Website or using the Product or otherwise providing information to Amplitude, you understand that your Personal Data may be transferred to the United States or another country other than your country of residence and you consent to such transfer. In order to ensure that your Personal Data receives an adequate level of protection and security, Amplitude has implemented appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of Personal Data, as required by applicable data protection laws. These safeguards may include using the European Commission-approved standard contractual clauses to protect the transfer of your Personal Data to Amplitude’s corporate affiliates or service providers, if required by applicable law.
Amplitude complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Amplitude has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles (together, the “DPF Principles”), the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
For the actions of third party agents Amplitude engages to process data on our behalf, Amplitude remains responsible and liable under the DPF Principles if a third party agent processes the Personal Data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Amplitude proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
7. Our Commitment To Data Security
Amplitude uses commercially reasonable physical, managerial, and technical safeguards designed to secure your Personal Data from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure. These measures include, for example, physical access controls, encryption, firewalls, and detection and monitoring. Our personnel who may have access to your Personal Data are required to keep that information confidential and trained on their security and privacy obligations.
You, however, are also responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your password and other information used by you to access the Website or use the Product. While Amplitude does its best to protect your Personal Data, any transmission of your Personal Data is done at your own risk and Amplitude cannot guarantee that such Personal Data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Except as expressly required by law, we are not responsible for the theft, destruction, loss or inadvertent disclosure of your Personal Data or information. If Amplitude learns of a security systems breach, then we may attempt to notify you electronically so that you can take appropriate protective steps. Amplitude may post a notice on the Website or in Product if a security breach occurs. Depending on where you live, you may have a legal right to receive notice of a security breach in writing.
8. Your Choices About How We Use And Disclose Information We Collect From You
We strive to provide you with choices regarding your Personal Data and we understand that you have the right to access, correct, delete, object to and restrict our use of your Personal Data. We also understand that you have the right to obtain a copy of your Personal Data from us and to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Personal Data by us. Please note that the rights set forth in this Section 8, unless otherwise noted, apply globally to all Visitors and Customers, whether or not you are a California resident or a resident of the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland. We have created mechanisms to provide you with the following control over your Personal Data:
You may choose not to provide Personal Data through our Website or when you register for the Product, in which case Amplitude may not be able to provide certain services to you or respond to your requests.
You can access, review, correct and/or change your Personal Data by logging into your account on the Website or Product and visiting your account profile page. You may also send us an email at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com to request access to, correct or delete any Personal Data that you have provided to us. In some cases, we may not be able to delete your Personal Data except by also deleting your user account.
If you do not wish to have your email address or other contact information used by us to promote our own products or services, you can opt-out by checking the relevant box located on the form on which we collect your Personal Data, by updating your user or subscription preferences in your account profile(s), or by sending us an email stating your request to privacy@amplitude.com. If we have sent you a promotional email, you may unsubscribe to receive future emails via the unsubscribe link in that email or adjust your user preferences in your account profile as noted above. The opt out specified above does not apply to information provided to us as a result of a purchase, product service experience or other transactions. You cannot unsubscribe from non-promotional and transactional communications.
You may also request a copy of your Personal Data that you have provided to us directly by sending an email to privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com. We will provide you a copy of your Personal Data in a commonly used electronic form.
If we collected and processed your Personal Data with your consent, where required by law, you can withdraw your consent at any time by emailing privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com.
Depending on your country or state of residence, including if you are a California resident, you have the right to opt out of the sale of Personal Data, certain sharing of Personal Data with third party ad partners, and the right to limit the use or disclosure of sensitive personal information. We do not sell your Personal Data or use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted by the CCPA. We may share Personal Data with third party ad partners, such as through cookies or by providing lists of email addresses for potential customers so we can reach them across the web with relevant ads. If you wish to opt out of sharing, you may adjust your preferences in the Cookie Settings.
If you wish to opt out of this sharing of your Personal Data with cookies on this domain, please update your Cookie Settings.
Please note to exercise the rights set forth above we may ask you to: (1) provide sufficient information to allow us to verify that you are the person about whom we have collected Personal Data, and (2) describe the request in sufficient detail to allow us to understand, evaluate, and respond to it. Each request that meets both of these criteria will be considered a "Valid Request." We may not respond to requests that do not meet these criteria. We will only use Personal Data provided in a Valid Request to verify you and complete your request. You do not need an account to submit a Valid Request.
We will work to respond to your Valid Request within 30 days of receipt. We will not charge you a fee for making a Valid Request unless your Valid Request(s) is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that your Valid Request warrants a fee, we will notify you of the fee and explain that decision before completing your request.
You may submit a Valid Request, or appeal our response to a valid request, by emailing us at privacy@amplitude.com or ccpa@amplitude.com with the appropriate information and detail.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations. We will not deny you our goods or services, charge you different prices or rates, or provide you a lower quality of goods and services if you exercise your rights under the GDPR, CCPA or other applicable data privacy laws or regulations.
9. Other Information About Our Privacy Practices
9.1
Our Retention Practices
Personal Data that Amplitude collects and processes as a controller for the purposes identified in this Privacy Notice are not kept by Amplitude for longer than is necessary for the specific purpose identified in this Privacy Notice, unless required to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your Personal Data to comply with applicable laws or regulations), resolve disputes, and enforce our legal agreements and policies. When we no longer have a legitimate business need to retain your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
9.2
Children’s Privacy
Amplitude’s Website and Product are not directed at children. We do not knowingly collect or solicit Personal Data directly from individuals that are under the age of 13. If you are under 13, please do not provide or send us any Personal Data or attempt to register for or otherwise use the Product. If we learn that a child under 13 has directly provided us with their Personal Data through the Website or Product, or that we have collected information for a child under 13 through our marketing activities, then we will delete that information. If you believe a child under 13 has registered for an account on the Website or Product, or is receiving marketing materials from Amplitude, please contact us at privacy@amplitude.com.
9.3
Automated Decision-Making
Amplitude does not use any Personal Data provided by you for the purpose of automated decision-making or profiling.
9.4
Other Websites; Links
Our Website, Product or marketing materials may contain links to other third party websites or applications (such as Facebook, LinkedIn or Twitter). This Privacy Notice does not apply to any third party websites, including through any application that may link to or be accessible from or on the Website or Product, and Amplitude is not responsible for the privacy policies and the content of the third party websites or applications.
10. Updates And Changes To The Privacy Notice
Please note that we reserve the right, at any time, to add to, change, update, or modify this Privacy Notice, to reflect changes in our practices, technologies, additional factors, and to be consistent with applicable data protection and privacy laws or other legal requirements. The modified Privacy Notice will be posted on this website along with the effective date. If, in our reasonable discretion, the changes are material, we will provide you with additional notice (such as adding a notice on our Website, in the Product, or sending you an email notification). Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective when they are posted on this page.
11. Disputes
As part of our commitment to the DPF Principles, if you are a resident of the European Union, UK, or Switzerland and you have a privacy or data use concern, please contact Amplitude directly at privacy@amplitude.com and Amplitude will use its best efforts to address your concern within 45 days of receipt of your complaint. For an unresolved privacy or data use concern that Amplitude has not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
.
For any DPF disputes that cannot be resolved by the methods above, you may be able to invoke a binding arbitration process under certain conditions. To find out more about the DPF's binding arbitration scheme, please see Annex I of the DPF Principles, here:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/Participation-Requirements-Data-Privacy-Framework-DPF-Principles-dpf
.
The Federal Trade Commission has investigation and enforcement authority over Amplitude’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF
12. California Privacy Rights
Under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 and its amendments (“CCPA”), California residents have certain rights to disclosures about how we collect, use, retain and disclose your Personal Data. This section addresses those requirements. For a description of all of our data collection, use and disclosure practices, please read this Privacy Notice in its entirety.
Personal Data Collection and Disclosure
Amplitude does not sell Personal Data as we understand the term “sell” to be defined by the CCPA. We share Personal Data, as we understand the term “share” to be defined by the CCPA, as set forth below.
The categories of Personal Data we may collect from you, from third parties, and from your interactions with us, and categories of third party recipients to whom we disclose such Personal Data for business purposes are set forth below. For additional detail about the Personal Data we collect and use and with whom we share this Personal Data and for what purpose, please review Sections 3 and 4 above.
Identifiers (such as name, email address, work address, and phone number)
Service providers; third parties
Commercial information (such as account records and transaction data)
Service providers; third parties
Internet or other network or device activity (such as browsing history or Website or Product usage)
Service providers
Geolocation data (such as country, city, or approximate location inferred from your IP address)
Service providers
Professional or employment-related data
Service providers; third parties
The following categories of Personal Data have been shared in the preceding 12 months with third party advertising partners and advertising technology providers so that we can reach you with advertisements for our products and services and make them more relevant to you:
Identifiers and contact information
Analytics or other electronic network activity.
Amplitude does not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those permitted purposes under the CCPA. Amplitude does not have actual knowledge that it sells or shares Personal Data of individuals under the age of 16.
We retain Personal Data as described in Section 9.1 above.
California law gives California residents the right to make certain requests with regard to their Personal Data. Please see Section 8 for a description of your choices and how you may make a request.
13. Contact Us
If you have any comments, concerns or questions about this Privacy Notice or our privacy practices in general, please send an email to
privacy@amplitude.com
,
ccpa@amplitude.com
, or send mail to:
Amplitude, Inc.
Attn: Privacy
201 Third Street, Suite 200
San Francisco, CA 94103
EFFECTIVE DATE
This Privacy Notice was last updated on September 26, 2023.
14. Cookies
Amplitude uses cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns. Below we describe what cookies and web beacons are, why we use cookies and web beacons, the types of cookies and web beacons that we use, as well as what you can do in order to manage and delete cookies and web beacons.
What are cookies and web beacons?
Cookies are small text files that websites often store on computer hard drives or mobile devices of visitors to their websites. A cookie contains a unique number, which is used to recognize your computer or mobile device when you return to our Website. Cookies can remain on your computer or mobile device for different periods of time. The cookies can be either "persistent" cookies or "session" cookies. Persistent cookies are stored by a web browser and remain valid until a set expiration date. Session cookies only exist while your internet browser is open and are automatically deleted once you close your browser.
Web beacons (also referred to as clear gifs, pixel tags, and single-pixel gifs) are small electronic files contained on pages of websites that permit companies to count users who have visited certain webpages on a website and are used for other related website statistics (e.g., recording the popularity of certain website content and verifying system and server integrity).
What does Amplitude
use cookies and web beacons for?
Amplitude uses a variety of cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies for different purposes. Specifically, Amplitude uses cookies and web beacons to enhance the experience of our visitors to our Website (for example, by remembering your preferences and letting you navigate between pages efficiently) and to better understand how the Website and Product are used. Cookies may tell us, for example, whether you have visited the Website before or whether you are a new visitor.
What types of cookies and web beacons are used by Amplitude?
Amplitude uses both first-party and third-party cookies and web beacons. First-party cookies and web beacons are cookies and web beacons that are served directly by Amplitude to your computer or mobile device. Third-party cookies and web beacons are served by a third-party service provider on behalf of Amplitude. Third-party cookies are most commonly used for advertising and analytics purposes.
There are four categories of cookies and web beacons used by Amplitude. Specifically, Amplitude uses essential, performance, functionality and advertising cookies and web beacons.
Essential cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are necessary for the operation of the Website and Product. These tracking technologies enable you to move around on the Website and use the Website’s features. You may not opt-out of these types of cookies because they are required to operate the Website and Product.
Performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies collect information about how you have used the Website and Product. We use performance cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies to improve the user experience with our Website and Product.
Functionality cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies allow us to remember how you are logged into our Website, when you logged in or out and the actions you have taken while you have been logged into the Website.
Advertising cookies, web beacons and other tracking technologies are used by our third-party service providers to deliver advertising to you on other third-party websites as well as help measure the effectiveness of our advertising campaigns. We also use these types of cookies to analyze Website visits and ad conversions from third-party websites.
The table below lists the types of cookies and third party service providers currently used by Amplitude but may not include all cookies or third party service providers. In addition, the below list of cookies and third party service providers is subject to change at any time.
Performance
Amplitude
We use our own products and services to analyze the user behavior within our website and our own products and services.
For more information about our privacy practices, see
https://amplitude.com/privacy
Performance
Google Analytics
We use Google Analytics to analyze the use of our website.
For more information about Google’s privacy practices, see
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Functional
Intercom
We use Intercom to power chat functionality.
For more information about Intercom’s privacy practices, see
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
Advertising
Marketo
We use Marketo for marketing automation services.
For more information about Marketo’s cookie policy, see
https://documents.marketo.com/legal/cookies/
Advertising
Doubleclick
We use Doubleclick to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about opting out of the ads, see
https://adssettings.google.com/u/0/authenticated
Advertising
LinkedIn
We use LinkedIn to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on LinkedIn.
For more information about LinkedIn’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Advertising
Facebook
We use Facebook to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Facebook.
For more information about Facebook’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.facebook.com/help/www/213802165366955
Advertising
AddThis
We use AddThis for their website tools like social sharing buttons.
For more information about AddThis’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.oracle.com/legal/privacy/addthis-privacy-policy.html
Advertising
StackAdapt
We use StackAdapt to track advertisements and measure website visits and conversions.
For more information about StackAdapt’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.stackadapt.com/platform-and-services-privacy-policy
Advertising
Bing
We use Bing to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Bing.
For more information about Bing’s privacy practices, please see
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/privacystatement
Advertising
Reddit
We use Reddit to track conversions and website visits from our advertisements displayed on Reddit.
For more information about Reddit’s privacy practices, please see
https://www.reddit.com/policies/privacy-policy
What are your choices about cookies?
You can decide whether or not to accept cookies through our Cookie Settings link on our Website. Most browsers allow you to configure the browser settings so that cookies from websites cannot be placed on your computer or mobile device. If you choose not to accept cookies, then you may be able to continue browsing our Website but we may not be able to provide you with certain features. If you want to opt out of advertising or performance cookies, then you may do so by reviewing the privacy policies of the third party service providers who serve the advertising and performance cookies identified above. If you would like further information about cookies and how to manage and delete them, please visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
or
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
You can also delete all cookies that are already on your computer. If you do this, however, you may have to manually adjust some preferences every time you visit a site and the Product, Website and functionalities may not work.
What are your choices about cookies and interest-based advertisements?
Through the Digital Advertising Alliance and Network Advertising Initiative, several media and marketing associations have developed an industry self-regulatory program to give consumers a better understanding of, and greater control over, ads that are customized based on a consumer’s online behavior across different websites and properties. To make choices about internet-based ads from participating third parties, including to opt-out of receiving behaviorally targeted advertisements from participating organizations or to learn more about opting out of advertising cookies, please visit the Network Advertising Initiative’s or Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer opt-out pages, which are located at
http://networkadvertising.org/choices/
or
www.aboutads.info/choices
. For those users located in the European Union, you can visit the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s user information website a
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
.
15. Previous Privacy Version
August 28, 2023
December 30, 2022
Sub-policy 1
https://sentry.io/privacy/:
This app works best with JavaScript enabled.
Back to all legal docs
Business Associate Amendment
Data Processing Addendum
Privacy Policy
What does Sentry do?
What personal information does Sentry collect?
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
Legal basis for processing personal information
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
Cookies and similar tracking technology
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
International data transfers
Data retention
Your data protection rights
Children’s privacy
Third-party websites
Updates to this Privacy Policy
How to contact us
Supplemental notice for California residents
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Version
/legal/privacy/3.3.1/
of This Agreement was created on
May 31, 2024
.
Read what has changed
This Privacy Policy sets out how Sentry collects, discloses, and uses personal information about you and how you can exercise your privacy rights. This Privacy Policy applies to personal information that we collect when you visit our website at sentry.io (“
Site
”), use our products and services (“
Service
”), or otherwise interact with us (e.g., by attending an event or communicating with us). If you do not agree with this policy, please do not access or use our Site or Service or interact with any other aspect of our business.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to data submitted to the Service (“
Service Data
”). A separate agreement (“
Customer Agreement
”) governs delivery, access, and use of the Service, including the processing of Service Data. With respect to any personal information included in Service Data, the organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) that entered into the Customer Agreement (“
Customer
”) controls its instance of the Service and any associated Service Data. If you have any questions about a Customer’s instance of the Service and any associated Service Data, please contact the Customer.
We recommend that you read this Privacy Policy in full to ensure you are fully informed.  However, if you only want to access a particular section of this Privacy Policy, then you can click on the relevant link below to jump to that section.
Table of contents
What does Sentry do?
What personal information does Sentry collect?
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
Legal basis for processing personal information
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
Cookies and similar tracking technology
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
International data transfers
Data retention
Your data protection rights
Children’s privacy
Third-party websites
Updates to this Privacy Policy
How to contact us
Supplemental notice for California residents
What does Sentry do?
Sentry offers an application monitoring solution designed to identify, monitor, and alert developers to errors, bugs, and other performance issues that are occurring in their applications.
For more information about Sentry, please see the “About Us” section of our Site at
https://sentry.io/about/
.
Return to top
What personal information does Sentry collect?
The personal information that we may collect about you broadly falls into the following categories:
Information that you provide
We collect information about you when you input it into our Site or the Service or otherwise provide it directly to us.
Account and profile creation
We collect information about you when you register for an account, create or modify your profile, and set preferences for the Service. For example, you may provide your contact information, including your first and last name, email address, and password when you register for the Service. You may also have the option of adding an avatar to your profile to be displayed in the Service. We keep track of your preferences when you select settings within the Service, including marketing and notification settings.
Sign in via other platforms
Instead of creating a user account, you can log in via your account with other platforms (currently Google, Github, or Azure Devops). We will not collect the password that you use for the relevant platform, but we may collect details from your account with the platform, such as username and email address.
Requests and inquiries
You may choose to provide us with information when you contact us about our Service or otherwise interact with us. For example, you may choose to submit information regarding a problem you are experiencing with our Service and send us screenshots to help in resolving the problem. You may submit your contact information to register for our events, to subscribe to receive marketing communications from us, or to make an inquiry through our Site. You may also provide content to us when you participate in a survey, contest, promotion, sweepstake, activity, or event, including via social media and other content platforms.
Purchases
If you register for a paid Service, we will collect purchase information, such as the Service plan that you purchase and information related to refunds, credits, and cancellations, and your billing address and payment information. Please note that any payment information you provide is sent directly to a third-party payment processor. We have no access to and do not store your payment information.
Information that we collect from your device and usage
We collect certain information about your device and how you and your device interact with us and our Site or Service. In some countries, including countries in the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom (together, ”
Europe
”), this information may be considered personal data under applicable data protection laws.
Specifically, the information we collect will include information such as your IP address, device type, unique device identification numbers, browser-type, operating system, software installed on your device, product keys, general location information (such as inferred from an IP address), and referring URL.  We also collect information about how you and your device have interacted with our Site or Service or with us via email, including the pages you accessed, features you used, Service you purchased, links you clicked, and when you accessed and for how long.
Some of this information is collected using cookies and similar tracking technology, as explained further under the heading
“Cookies and similar tracking technology”
below.
Information that we obtain from third-party sources
From time to time, we receive personal information about you from third-party sources (including social media and other content platforms, public databases, and from our business and channel partners and service providers).
The types of information we collect from third parties include name, email addresses, job titles, and social media profiles. We may combine this information with information we collect through other means described above. This helps us to maintain and improve the accuracy of our records, identify new customers, deliver personalized communications, and suggest services that may be of interest to you.
Return to top
What does Sentry use my personal information for?
We use your information for business and commercial purposes, such as to:
Provide, maintain, and improve the Site and Service, including system administration, system security, and adding new features or capabilities;
Manage your account and send you related information, including confirmations, updates, technical notices, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Respond to your comments, questions, and requests, and provide customer care and support services;
Communicate with you about the Service, products, offers, surveys, events, content, and other news and information we think may be of interest to you;
Monitor and analyse trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Site and Service and our communications to you;
Detect, investigate, and prevent fraudulent transactions and other illegal activities, protect the rights and property of Sentry and others, and comply with legal requirements;
Personalize and improve the Site and Service and provide advertisements, content, and features that match your profile and interests, and remember information about your preferences for the Site and Service;
Administer surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, and other activities; and
Carry out any other purpose for which the information was collected.
We may aggregate or de-identify information collected through the Service. We may use aggregated or de-identified data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any third parties, including without limitation, advertisers, promotional partners, sponsors, event promoters, and others.
Return to top
Legal basis for processing personal information
If you are based in Europe, we collect and process information about you only where we have a legal basis for doing so under applicable European laws. This means we collect and process your information only where:
We need it to provide the Site or Service, including to register you as a new user, operate the Site or Service, provide technical support, and to protect the safety and security of the Site or Service;
It satisfies our legitimate interests, such as to market and promote the Service and to protect our legal rights and interests, which are not overridden by your own interests, rights, and freedoms;
It is necessary to comply with a legal obligation or in connection with a legal claim, such as to respond to judicial orders or subpoenas; or
You provide consent for a specific purpose, such as for marketing communications (where consent is required under applicable marketing laws).
The legal bases depend on the type of information and the purpose for our processing. In some contexts, more than one legal basis applies. When we process your information based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on such consent before it is withdrawn. To exercise your rights, see
“Your data protection rights”
below. Where we are using your information because we or a third party (e.g., your employer) have a legitimate interest to do so, you have the right to object to that use though, in some cases, this may mean no longer using the Service.
Return to top
Who does Sentry disclose my personal information to?
We disclose your personal information to the following categories of recipients:
Affiliate companies
who help operate and improve our Site and Service (including to support the delivery of, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the security of our Site and Service), offer other Sentry affiliated services to you, or who otherwise process personal information for the purposes described in this policy. The protections of this policy apply to the information we disclose in these circumstances.
Third-party services providers
who provide hosting, storage, support, payment processing, billing, communication, analysis, and other services to us, which may require them to access or use information about you. If a service provider needs to access or use information about you to perform services on our behalf, they do so under appropriate security and confidentiality procedures designed to protect your information.
Third-party go-to-market partners
who provide referral, sale, resale, or similar go-to-market services. We may disclose your information, like your name, email address, and job title, in connection with their services. We may also disclose information to these third parties where you have agreed to that disclosure.
Third-party analytics partners
to provide analytics services. These entities may use Cookies in the same way we do, to among other things, track and analyze data, and better understand your online activity.
Third-party platforms
when you, your administrator or other Service users choose to install or enable third-party apps, add-ons or other platforms for use with the Service. Doing so may give the providers of those platforms access to your account and information about you, like your name and email address, and any content you choose to connect with those platforms. Please note that when you use third-party platforms, your use will be governed by their own terms and privacy policies.
Any
competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party
where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation, (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, or (iii) to protect your vital interests or those of any other person.
An
actual or potential buyer
(and its agents and advisers) in connection with any actual or proposed purchase, merger, or acquisition of any part of our business, provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this policy.
Any
other person with your consent
to the disclosure.
Return to top
Cookies and similar tracking technology
We use cookies and similar tracking technology (collectively, “
Cookies
”) to collect and use personal information about you, including to understand and save your preferences, and to compile aggregate data about Site and Service interaction.
We may also allow certain third parties (e.g., service providers such as Stripe) to access their own cookies or other tracking technologies on your computer, mobile phone, or other device you use to access the Site or Service. Cookies may be associated with de-identified data linked to or derived from data you voluntarily have submitted to us (e.g., your email address) that we may share with a service provider in hashed, non-human-readable form.
You may refuse to accept Cookies by activating the setting on your browser that allows you to refuse the setting of Cookies. You can find information on popular browsers and how to adjust your Cookie preferences at the browser provider’s websites. You can choose to disable Cookies, but if you do, your ability to use or access certain parts of our Site and Service may be affected.
We do not recognize or respond to browser-initiated Do Not Track signals.
Return to top
How does Sentry keep my personal information secure?
We use appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect the personal information that we collect and process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal information. However, no security system is impenetrable and due to the inherent nature of the Internet, we cannot guarantee that information, during transmission through the Internet, or while stored on our systems or otherwise in our care, is absolutely safe from intrusion by others. In particular, email sent to or from Sentry may not be secure, and you should therefore take special care in deciding what information you send to us via email.
Return to top
International data transfers
In some cases your personal information is transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are resident. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
Specifically, our Site and Service are hosted in the United States and Germany, and our affiliate companies and third-party service providers operate around the world, including in the United States, Canada and Europe. This means that when we collect your personal information, we may process it in any of these countries.
Where we transfer your personal information to countries and territories outside of Europe and Switzerland, which have been formally recognised as providing an adequate level of protection for personal information, we rely on the relevant “adequacy decisions” from the European Commission and Swiss Federal Administration, and “adequacy regulations” from the Secretary of State in the United Kingdom.
Where the transfer is not subject to an adequacy decision or regulations, we have taken appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information will remain protected in accordance with this policy. The safeguards we use are the European Commission-approved standard contractual clauses, the UK International Data Transfer Agreement, and other appropriate legal mechanisms. This is how transfers of personal information between our group companies and with our third-party service providers will be safeguarded.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Functional Software, Inc. (our registered company name) participates in and complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (collectively, the
“Data Privacy Framework”
) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information about you that is transferred from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the U.S.  We have self-certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles for all information about you that is received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. We have also self-certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (together with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles, the
“Data Privacy Framework Principles”
) for all information about you that is received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles will govern.
As required under the Data Privacy Framework, when we receive information under the Data Privacy Framework and then transfer it to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf, we have certain liability under the Data Privacy Framework if the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework and we are responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. We may be required to disclose information about you under the Data Privacy Framework in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view Sentry’s certification, please see the
Data Privacy Framework website
.
We encourage you to contact us as provided below should you have a Data Privacy Framework-related (or general privacy-related) complaint and we commit to resolve any such complaint. We have further committed to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework to JAMS, a U.S.-based alternative dispute resolution provider.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgement of your Data Privacy Framework-related complaint from us, or if you are not satisfied with our response to your Data Privacy Framework-related complaint, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the
Data Privacy Framework website
, including when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted, you may invoke binding arbitration.
We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Return to top
Data retention
We retain the personal information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (e.g., to provide you with a service you have requested or to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements).  In certain circumstances, we will need to keep your information for legal reasons after our relationship has ended. For example, we may retain your data for longer than the usual retention period when we have a legal obligation to do such, to deal with and resolve requests and complaints, to protect an individual’s rights and property, and for litigation and regulatory matters. The specific retention periods depend on the nature of the information and why it is collected and processed and the nature of any legal requirement. The criteria we use to determine the retention period include:
How long is the personal information needed to provide the Service or operate our business?
This includes such things as maintaining and improving the performance of the Service, keeping our systems secure, and maintaining appropriate business and financial records. This is the general rule that establishes the baseline for most data retention periods.
Is there an automated control, such as in your Sentry dashboard, that enables you to access and delete the personal information at any time?
If there is not, a shortened data retention time will generally be adopted.
Is the personal information of a sensitive type?
If so, a shortened retention time would generally be appropriate.
Has consent been provided for a longer retention period?
If so, we will retain the data in accordance with your consent.
Is Sentry subject to a legal, contractual, or similar obligation to retain the data?
Examples can include mandatory data retention laws in the applicable jurisdiction, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data that must be retained for the purposes of litigation.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need or legal reason to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (e.g., because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
Return to top
Your data protection rights
Depending on your location, you may have the following data protection rights.  To exercise any of them see specific instructions below or contact us using the contact details provided under the
“How to contact us”
heading below.
You may
access, correct, update or request deletion
of your personal information by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
.
You can
object to processing
of your personal information, ask us to
restrict processing
of your personal information or
request portability
of your personal information by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
.
You have the right to
opt-out of marketing
communications we send you at any time.  You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing emails we send you or otherwise following the directions in the emails.  You can also make choices about your receipt of marketing communications through the subscription settings in your account.
If we have collected and processed your personal information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time by submitting a request at
https://sentry.io/contact/gdpr/
. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a supervisory authority
about our collection and use of your personal information. For more information, please contact your local supervisory authority. (Contact details for supervisory authorities in Europe are available
here
.) Certain supervisory authorities may require that you exhaust our own internal complaints process before looking into your complaint.
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
Return to top
Children’s privacy
Sentry’s Site and Service are not directed to children under 16. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 16. If you become aware that a child has provided us with personal information without parental consent, please contact us using the contact details provided under the
“How to contact us”
heading below. If we become aware that a child under 16 has provided us with personal information without parental consent, we will take steps to remove such information and terminate the child’s account.
If you are 16 or older, but have not reached your jurisdiction’s age of majority (such that you are able to enter a contract), you should only use the Service with permission from your parent or guardian.
Return to top
Third-party websites
The Site and Service may link to third-party websites or platforms from companies other than Sentry, such as to relevant online resources, social media platforms, our partners’ websites, payment processors, and other third-party websites. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites. If you have any questions about how these other websites use your information, you should review their policies and contact them directly. We are not responsible for the actions of third parties.
Return to top
Updates to this Privacy Policy
We may update this policy from time to time in response to changing legal, regulatory, technical, or business developments. When we update this policy, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. We will obtain your consent to any material changes to this policy if, and where, required by applicable data protection laws.
You can see when this policy was last updated by checking the date displayed at the top of this policy.
Return to top
How to contact us
If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal information, please contact by sending us an email at
compliance@sentry.io
.
The data controller of your personal information is Functional Software, Inc. d/b/a Sentry. Our address is Functional Software, Inc., 45 Fremont Street, 8th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94105.
Return to top
Supplemental notice for California residents
The Supplemental notice for California residents can be found
here
.
Return to top
A peek at your privacy
Here’s a quick look at how Sentry handles your personal information (PII).
×
Who we collect PII from
We collect PII about people browsing our website, users of the Sentry service, prospective customers, and people who otherwise interact with us.
What if my PII is included in data sent to Sentry by a Sentry customer (e.g., someone using Sentry to monitor their app)? In this case you have to contact the Sentry customer (e.g., the maker of the app). We do not control the data that is sent to us through the Sentry service for the purposes of application monitoring.
Am I included?
PII we may collect about you
PII provided by you and related to your
Account, profile, and login
Requests and inquiries
Purchases
PII collected from your device and usage
PII collected from third parties (e.g., social media)
Tell me more
How we use your PII
To operate our site and service
To protect and improve our site and service
To provide customer care and support
To communicate with you
For other purposes (that we inform you of at collection)
How exactly?
Third parties who receive your PII
We may disclose your PII to the following type of recipients:
Subsidiaries and other affiliates
Service providers
Partners (go-to-market, analytics)
Third-party platforms (when you connect them to our service)
Governmental authorities (where necessary)
An actual or potential buyer
What do they do?
We use cookies (but not for advertising)
We do not use advertising or targeting cookies
We use necessary cookies to run and improve our site and service
You can disable cookies but this can impact your use or access to certain parts of our site and service
How can I choose?
Know your rights
You may have the following rights related to your PII:
Access, correct, and update
Object to or restrict processing
Port over
Opt-out of marketing
Be forgotten by Sentry
Withdraw your consent
Complain about us
What can I do?
If you have any questions or concerns about your privacy at Sentry, please email us at
compliance@sentry.io
.
If you are a California resident, see our
Supplemental notice
.
Read the full policy
Sub-policy 2
https://cloud.google.com/terms/cloud-privacy-notice:
Skip to main content
cloud.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Overview
More
Solutions
More
Products
More
Pricing
More
Resources
More
Docs
Support
Console
Contact Us
Start free
Accelerate your digital transformation
Learn more
Key benefits
Why Google Cloud
AI and ML
Multicloud
Global infrastructure
Data Cloud
Modern Infrastructure Cloud
Security
Productivity and collaboration
Reports and insights
Executive insights
Analyst reports
Whitepapers
Customer stories
Industry Solutions
Retail
Consumer Packaged Goods
Financial Services
Healthcare and Life Sciences
Media and Entertainment
Telecommunications
Games
Manufacturing
Supply Chain and Logistics
Government
Education
See all industry solutions
See all solutions
Application Modernization
CAMP
Modernize Traditional Applications
Migrate from PaaS&#58; Cloud Foundry, Openshift
Migrate from Mainframe
Modernize Software Delivery
DevOps Best Practices
SRE Principles
Day 2 Operations for GKE
FinOps and Optimization of GKE
Run Applications at the Edge
Architect for Multicloud
Go Serverless
Artificial Intelligence
Customer Engagement Suite with Google AI
Document AI
Vertex AI Search for retail
Gemini for Google Cloud
Generative AI on Google Cloud
APIs and Applications
New Business Channels Using APIs
Unlocking Legacy Applications Using APIs
Open Banking APIx
Data Analytics
Data Migration
Data Lake Modernization
Stream Analytics
Marketing Analytics
Datasets
Business Intelligence
AI for Data Analytics
Databases
Database Migration
Database Modernization
Databases for Games
Google Cloud Databases
Migrate Oracle workloads to Google Cloud
Open Source Databases
SQL Server on Google Cloud
Gemini for Databases
Infrastructure Modernization
Application Migration
SAP on Google Cloud
High Performance Computing
Windows on Google Cloud
Data Center Migration
Active Assist
Virtual Desktops
Rapid Migration and Modernization Program
Backup and Disaster Recovery
Red Hat on Google Cloud
Cross-Cloud Network
Observability
Productivity and Collaboration
Google Workspace
Google Workspace Essentials
Cloud Identity
Chrome Enterprise
Security
Security Analytics and Operations
Web App and API Protection
Security and Resilience Framework
Risk and compliance as code (RCaC)
Software Supply Chain Security
Security Foundation
Google Cloud Cybershield™
Startups and SMB
Startup Program
Small and Medium Business
Software as a Service
Featured Products
Compute Engine
Cloud Storage
BigQuery
Cloud Run
Google Kubernetes Engine
Vertex AI
Looker
Apigee API Management
Cloud SQL
Gemini
Cloud CDN
See all products (100+)
AI and Machine Learning
Vertex AI Platform
Vertex AI Studio
Vertex AI Agent Builder
Conversational Agents
Vertex AI Search
Speech-to-Text
Text-to-Speech
Translation AI
Document AI
Vision AI
Contact Center as a Service
See all AI and machine learning products
Business Intelligence
Looker
Looker Studio
Compute
Compute Engine
App Engine
Cloud GPUs
Migrate to Virtual Machines
Spot VMs
Batch
Sole-Tenant Nodes
Bare Metal
Recommender
VMware Engine
Cloud Run
See all compute products
Containers
Google Kubernetes Engine
Cloud Run
Cloud Build
Artifact Registry
Cloud Code
Cloud Deploy
Migrate to Containers
Deep Learning Containers
Knative
Data Analytics
BigQuery
Looker
Dataflow
Pub/Sub
Dataproc
Cloud Data Fusion
Cloud Composer
BigLake
Dataplex
Dataform
Analytics Hub
See all data analytics products
Databases
AlloyDB for PostgreSQL
Cloud SQL
Firestore
Spanner
Bigtable
Datastream
Database Migration Service
Bare Metal Solution
Memorystore
Developer Tools
Artifact Registry
Cloud Code
Cloud Build
Cloud Deploy
Cloud Deployment Manager
Cloud SDK
Cloud Scheduler
Cloud Source Repositories
Infrastructure Manager
Cloud Workstations
Gemini Code Assist
See all developer tools
Distributed Cloud
Google Distributed Cloud Connected
Google Distributed Cloud Air-gapped
Hybrid and Multicloud
Google Kubernetes Engine
Apigee API Management
Migrate to Containers
Cloud Build
Observability
Cloud Service Mesh
Google Distributed Cloud
Industry Specific
Anti Money Laundering AI
Cloud Healthcare API
Device Connect for Fitbit
Telecom Network Automation
Telecom Data Fabric
Telecom Subscriber Insights
Spectrum Access System (SAS)
Integration Services
Application Integration
Workflows
Apigee API Management
Cloud Tasks
Cloud Scheduler
Dataproc
Cloud Data Fusion
Cloud Composer
Pub/Sub
Eventarc
Management Tools
Cloud Shell
Cloud console
Cloud Endpoints
Cloud IAM
Cloud APIs
Service Catalog
Cost Management
Observability
Carbon Footprint
Config Connector
Active Assist
See all management tools
Maps and Geospatial
Earth Engine
Google Maps Platform
Media Services
Cloud CDN
Live Stream API
OpenCue
Transcoder API
Video Stitcher API
Migration
Migration Center
Application Migration
Migrate to Virtual Machines
Cloud Foundation Toolkit
Database Migration Service
Migrate to Containers
BigQuery Data Transfer Service
Rapid Migration and Modernization Program
Transfer Appliance
Storage Transfer Service
VMware Engine
Mixed Reality
Immersive Stream for XR
Networking
Cloud Armor
Cloud CDN and Media CDN
Cloud DNS
Cloud Load Balancing
Cloud NAT
Cloud Connectivity
Network Connectivity Center
Network Intelligence Center
Network Service Tiers
Virtual Private Cloud
Private Service Connect
See all networking products
Operations
Cloud Logging
Cloud Monitoring
Error Reporting
Managed Service for Prometheus
Cloud Trace
Cloud Profiler
Cloud Quotas
Productivity and Collaboration
AppSheet
AppSheet Automation
Google Workspace
Google Workspace Essentials
Gemini for Workspace
Cloud Identity
Chrome Enterprise
Security and Identity
Cloud IAM
Sensitive Data Protection
Mandiant Managed Defense
Google Threat Intelligence
Security Command Center
Cloud Key Management
Mandiant Incident Response
Chrome Enterprise Premium
Assured Workloads
Google Security Operations
Mandiant Consulting
See all security and identity products
Serverless
Cloud Run
Cloud Functions
App Engine
Workflows
API Gateway
Storage
Cloud Storage
Block Storage
Filestore
Persistent Disk
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Local SSD
Storage Transfer Service
Parallelstore
Google Cloud NetApp Volumes
Backup and DR Service
Web3
Blockchain Node Engine
Blockchain RPC
Save money with our transparent approach to pricing
Request a quote
Pricing overview and tools
Google Cloud pricing
Pricing calculator
Google Cloud free tier
Cost optimization framework
Cost management tools
Product-specific Pricing
Compute Engine
Cloud SQL
Google Kubernetes Engine
Cloud Storage
BigQuery
See full price list with 100+ products
Learn & build
Google Cloud Free Program
Solution Generator
Quickstarts
Blog
Learning Hub
Google Cloud certification
Cloud computing basics
Cloud Architecture Center
Connect
Innovators
Developer Center
Events and webinars
Google Cloud Community
Consulting and Partners
Google Cloud Consulting
Google Cloud Marketplace
Google Cloud partners
Become a partner
Home
Back to Google Cloud Terms Directory
Current
Google Cloud Privacy
                      Notice
Effective Date: February 6, 2025
This Google Cloud Privacy Notice describes how we collect
                      and process your personal information in relation
                      to
Google Workspace (including Google Workspace for Education)
,
Google Cloud Platform
,
Google Cloud Marketplace
,
Cloud Identity
(when sold separately),
Implementation Services
and
Google Cloud Training
(together,
                      “Cloud Services”).
We offer Cloud Services to our customers either directly
                      or via our authorized partners. Where we refer to our
                      customers in this notice, we also mean our partners and
                      their customers.
If European Union (EU), UK or Swiss data protection law
                      applies to the processing of Service Data relating to you,
                      you can review the
                      ‘
European Privacy Standards and GDPR
’
                      section below to learn more about your rights and Google’s
                      compliance with these laws.
If your organization has entered into our
Google Workspace for Education Service Data Addendum
,
                      please review the
Supplemental Google Cloud Privacy Notice
together with this notice.
Google processes Customer Data, Partner Data and Service
                      Data to provide Cloud Services. This Privacy Notice
                      applies solely to Service Data and
does
                        not
apply to Customer Data or Partner Data. We
                      explain what we mean by “Service Data” below.
Customer Data and Partner Data are defined in the
                      agreement(s) with our customers covering Cloud Services
                      and represent the data that you and our customers provide
                      for processing in Cloud Services. For more information
                      about how we process Customer Data and Partner Data, see
                      our
Cloud Data Processing Addendum (Customers)
and
Cloud Data Processing Addendum (Partners)
.
Service Data is the personal information Google collects
                      or generates during the provision and administration of
                      the Cloud Services and related technical support,
                      excluding any Customer Data and Partner Data.
Service Data consists of:
Account information.
We collect the data you or
                        your organization provide when creating an account for
                        Cloud Services or entering into a contract with us
                        (username, names, contact details and job titles).
Cloud payments and
                          transactions.
We keep reasonable
                        business records of charges, payments, and billing
                        details and issues.
Cloud settings and configurations.
We
                        record your configuration and settings, including
                        resource identifiers and attributes, and service and
                        security settings for data and other resources.
Technical and operational details of your
                          usage of Cloud Services.
We collect
                        information about usage, operational status, software
                        errors and crash reports, authentication details,
                        quality and performance metrics, and other technical
                        details necessary for us to operate and maintain Cloud
                        Services and related software. This information includes
                        device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens,
                        and IP addresses.
Your direct communications.
We keep
                        records of your communications and interactions with us
                        and our partners (for example, when you provide
                        feedback, ask questions or seek technical support).
Google processes Service Data for the following purposes:
Provide Cloud Services you request.
We use Service Data primarily to deliver the Cloud
                        Services that you and our customers request. This
                        includes processing Service Data as needed to conduct
                        checks before extending credit to certain customers, to
                        bill for the Cloud Services used, to ensure those
                        services are delivered or working as intended, to detect
                        and avoid outages or other technical problems, and to
                        secure your data and services.
Make recommendations to optimize use of Cloud
                          Services.
We use Service Data to provide you
                        and our customers with recommendations (for example,
                        suggesting ways to better secure your account or data,
                        reduce service charges or improve performance, or
                        optimize your configurations), and providing information
                        about new or related products and features. We also
                        evaluate your responses to our recommendations and other
                        feedback (if you choose to provide it).
Maintain and improve Cloud Services.
We evaluate Service Data to help us improve the
                        performance and functionality of Cloud Services. As we
                        improve Cloud Services for you, this will improve them
                        for our customers, and vice versa.
Provide and improve other services you
                          request.
We use Service Data to deliver and
                        improve other services that you and our customers
                        request, including Google or third-party services that
                        are enabled via the Cloud Services, administrative
                        consoles, application programming interfaces (APIs) or
                        command line interfaces (CLIs), or the Google
                        Workspace Marketplace.
Assist you.
We use Service Data to
                        provide technical support for Cloud Services that you
                        and our customers request, and to assess whether we have
                        met your needs. We also use Service Data to improve our
                        technical support, inform you and our customers about
                        updates to Cloud Services and send other notifications
                        relating to Cloud Services.
Protect you, our users,
customers,
the public, and Google.
We use Service Data
                        to detect, prevent and respond to fraud, abuse, security
                        risks, and technical issues that could harm you, other
                        users, our customers, the public, or Google. This
                        helps make our services safer, more reliable, and more
                        secure.
Comply with legal obligations.
We use
                        Service Data to comply with our legal obligations (for
                        example, where we’re responding to legal process or an
                        enforceable governmental request, or meeting our
                        financial record-keeping obligations).
To achieve these processing purposes, we use algorithms
                      to recognize patterns in Service Data, manual review of
                      Service Data (such as when you interact directly with our
                      billing or support teams), aggregation or anonymization of
                      Service Data to eliminate personal information, and
                      combination of Service Data with information from other
                      Google products and services. We also use Service Data for
                      internal reporting and analysis of applicable product and
                      business operations.
Please note, if your organization has entered into our
Google Workspace for Education Service Data Addendum
:
your organization will process Service Data collected
                        or generated from Google Workspace for Education, as a
                        controller, for purposes it is required to disclose to
                        you separately; and
Google’s processing purposes listed above will not
                        apply to you. The purposes that apply to you are
                        described in the
Supplemental Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
                        Please visit that link to learn more.
We maintain data centers around the world, and provide
                      Google Workspace (including Google Workspace for
                      Education) and Cloud Identity (when sold separately) from
these locations
,
                      and Google Cloud Platform from
these locations
.
Service Data may be processed on servers located outside
                      of the country where our users and customers are located
                      because Service Data is typically processed by centralized
                      or regionalized operations like billing, support, and
                      security.
Regardless of where Service Data is processed, we apply
                      the same protections described in this Privacy Notice.
                      When transferring Service Data outside of the European
                      Economic Area, the UK or Switzerland, we comply with
                      certain
legal frameworks
.
We build Cloud Services with strong security features to
                      protect your data. The insights we gain from providing our
                      services help us detect and automatically block security
                      threats from ever reaching you.
We work hard to protect the Service Data we hold from
                      unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure,
                      or destruction, including by:
Encrypting Service Data at rest and while in transit
                        between our facilities.
Regularly reviewing our Service Data collection,
                        storage, and processing practices, including our
                        physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized
                        access to our systems; and
Restricting access to Service Data to Google
                        employees, contractors, and agents who need it in order
                        to process Service Data for us. Anyone with this access
                        is subject to strict contractual confidentiality
                        obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they
                        fail to meet these obligations.
We instruct our affiliates to process Service Data for
                      the purposes listed under
                      "
Why We Process Service Data
"
                      above, in compliance with this Privacy Notice and
                      appropriate confidentiality and security measures.
We do not share Service Data with companies,
                      organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in
                      the following cases:
When you procure third-party services
We share Service Data outside
                      of Google when you or our customer choose(s) to procure a
                      third-party service through Google Cloud Platform, the
                      Google Cloud Platform Marketplace or the Google Workspace
                      Marketplace, or use a third-party application that
                      requests access to your Service Data.
With your consent
We’ll share Service Data
                      outside of Google where we have obtained your consent.
With your administrators and authorized resellers
When you use Cloud Services,
                      your administrator and resellers authorized to manage your
                      or your organization’s account will have access to certain
                      Service Data. For example, they may be able to:
View account and billing information, activity and
                            statistics
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Access your account information in order to
                            satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process,
                            or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your
                            information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We do not sell your Service
                      Data to any third parties.
We share Service Data with
                      trusted third party providers to process it for us as we
                      instruct them and in compliance with this Privacy Notice
                      and appropriate confidentiality and security measures. In
                      particular, we share Service Data with our third party
                      providers when you request technical support services (we
                      share the information you provide in the support ticket,
                      and those providers may communicate with you or your
                      administrator in that ticket, including providing updates
                      and closing the ticket) and professional services (we
                      share your contact details to enable communication and
                      collaboration).
For legal reasons
We share Service Data outside
                      of Google when we have a good-faith belief that access to,
                      or disclosure that Service Data is reasonably necessary
                      to:
Comply with applicable law, regulation, legal
                            process, or enforceable governmental request. We
                            share information about the number and type of
                            requests we receive from governments in
                            our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable agreements, including
                            investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud,
                            security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or
                            safety of Google, our customers, users, and the
                            public as required or permitted by law.
If Google is involved in a
                      reorganization, merger, acquisition, or sale of assets,
                      we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of Service
                      Data and give affected users notice before Service Data
                      becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Your organization may allow you to access and export your
                      data in order to back it up or transfer it to a service
                      outside of Google. Some Google Cloud Services enable you
                      to directly access and download the data you have stored
                      in the services. As further described in our
Google Workspace Data Subject Requests Guide
,
                      you or your organization may use various tools to access,
                      control, and export your data.
You and your organization’s administrator can access
                      several types of Service Data directly from Google Cloud,
                      including your account information, billing contact
                      information, payment and transaction information, as well
                      as product and communication settings and configurations.
If you’re otherwise unable to access your Service Data,
                      you can always request it
here
.
We retain Service Data for different periods of time
                      depending on the type of data, how we use it, and how you
                      configure your settings. When we no longer need Service
                      Data, we delete or anonymize it.
For each type of Service Data and processing operation,
                      we set retention timeframes based on the purposes for
                      which we process it, and ensure that the Service Data is
                      kept for no longer than necessary. We retain most types of
                      Service Data for a set period of up to 180 days (the exact
                      number depends on the specific type of data). However,
                      some Service Data may be kept for longer periods where
                      there is a business need. We generally have longer
                      retention periods (which can be over a year) for Service
                      Data that is kept for the following purposes:
Security, fraud and abuse prevention.
We retain
                        Service Data when it is necessary to protect against
                        fraudulent attempts to gain access to user accounts, or
                        to investigate violations of applicable Cloud Services
                        agreements. Usually, the Service Data retained where
                        there is reason to suspect fraud or abuse would include
                        device identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens,
                        and IP addresses, as well as log data about usage of the
                        Cloud Services.
Complying with legal or regulatory requirements.
We
                        retain Service Data when required by an enforceable
                        legal process, such as when Google receives a lawful
                        subpoena.
Complying with tax, accounting or financial requirements.
When Google processes a payment for you, or when you
                        make a payment to Google, we retain Service Data about
                        those transactions (including billing information),
                        typically for a minimum of five years, as required for
                        tax or accounting purposes, or to comply with applicable
                        financial regulations.
At the end of the applicable retention period, we follow
                      detailed protocols to make sure that the Service Data is
                      securely and completely deleted from our active systems
                      (the servers Google uses to run applications and store
                      data) or retained only in anonymized form. After
                      completion of these steps, copies of Service Data will
                      remain for a limited period in our encrypted backup
                      systems (which we maintain to protect Service Data from
                      accidental or malicious deletion and for outage and
                      disaster recovery purposes), before being overwritten by
                      new backup copies.
Your Google Account is your connection to all Google
                      products and services, not just Cloud Services. When you
                      choose to use Google products and services outside of
                      Cloud Services,
                      the
Google Privacy Policy
describes how your personal information (including your
                      Google Account profile information) is collected and used.
                      You and your administrator can control which other Google
                      services you may use while logged into a Google Account
                      managed by your organization.
If you interact with Cloud Services using a Google
                      Account managed by your organization, then your personal
                      information may be subject to your organization’s privacy
                      policies and processes, and you should direct privacy
                      inquiries to your organization.
Exercising your data protection rights
If European Union (EU), UK or Swiss data protection law
                      applies to the processing of Service Data relating to you,
                      you have certain rights, including the rights to access,
                      correct, delete and export your Service Data, and to
                      object to or request that we restrict processing of your
                      Service Data.
Google Cloud EMEA Ltd will be the data controller
                      responsible for your Service Data. However, where our
                      customer has entered into an agreement covering Cloud
                      Services with a different Google affiliate, that affiliate
                      will be the data controller responsible for processing
                      your Service Data in connection with billing for the Cloud
                      Services only.
If you want to exercise your data protection rights with
                      regard to Service Data we process in accordance with this
                      Privacy Notice, and you are not able to do so via the
                      tools available to you or your organization’s
                      administrator, you can contact Google via our
Privacy Help Center
.
You can always contact your local data protection
                      authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under
                      local law.
Our grounds for processing your Service Data
When we process Service Data for the purposes described
                      in this Privacy Notice (see "Why We Process Service Data”
                      above), we rely on the following legal grounds:
Purpose
Types of Service Data Processed
Legal Grounds
Provide Cloud Services you request.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud payments and transactions
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the
                                contractual obligations which we owe to our
                                customer to provide the Cloud Services.
Make recommendations to optimize use of Cloud
                                Services.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud payments and transactions
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
When we’re pursuing
legitimate interests
in offering the best service we can, and
                                ensuring our customers know how to get the most
                                out of our services.
In some cases we will seek your
consent
to send you marketing
                                communications.
Maintain and improve Cloud Services.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in offering the best
                                Cloud Services we can, and continuing to improve
                                the Cloud Services to meet our customers’ needs.
Provide and improve other services you
                                request.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the
                                contractual obligations we owe to our customer
                                to provide the Cloud Services, and where
                                necessary for our
legitimate interests
in
                                offering the best services we can, and
                                continuing to improve the Cloud Services to meet
                                our customers’ needs.
Assist you.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud payments and transactions
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for our
legitimate interests
in fulfilling the
                                contractual obligations we owe to our customer
                                to provide the Cloud Services.
Protect you, our users, customers, the public,
                                and Google.
The following types of Service Data, as
                                necessary for the purpose:
Account information
Cloud payments and transactions
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
Where necessary for Google’s
legitimate interest
to protect against
                                harm to the rights, property and safety of
                                Google, and where necessary for Google’s and
                                third parties’
legitimate interests
to
                                protect against harm to our users, our customers
                                and the public, including criminal acts and
                                rights violations.
Comply with legal obligations.
Depending on the specific legal obligations,
                                the following types of Service Data:
Account information
Cloud payments and transactions
Cloud settings and configurations
Technical and operational details of your
                                  use of Cloud Services
Your direct communications
When we have a
legal obligation
to do
                                so. For example, where we’re responding to legal
                                process or an enforceable governmental request,
                                or retaining information relating to your
                                purchases and communications to meet our
                                record-keeping obligations.
More
If you are using Google Workspace subject to our
Google Workspace for Education Service Data Addendum
,
                      please review the
Supplemental Google Cloud Privacy Notice
for information about the legal grounds we rely on when
                      processing your Service Data collected or generated from
                      Google Workspace for Education.
Additional information (Switzerland)
If Swiss data protection law applies to the processing of
                      your Service Data, the following additional information is
                      relevant.
Please see the section titled ‘Where Service Data is
                      Stored’ (above) for information on where we and our
                      affiliates process Service Data. We also disclose your
                      Service Data to service providers, partners and other
                      recipients (see the section titled ‘How We Share Service
                      Data’) that are located or process information in any
                      country in the world.
We comply with certain legal frameworks relating to the
                      transfer of information as set out in our
Legal Frameworks for Data Transfers
page. We may also transfer your information to a third
                      country based on an exception provided for by the Swiss
                      Federal Data Protection Act.
An exception may apply in the event of legal proceedings
                      abroad, in cases of overriding public interest or if the
                      performance of a contract with you or in your interest
                      requires disclosure, if you have consented, if the
                      information has been made generally available by you and
                      you have not objected to the processing, or the disclosure
                      is necessary in order to protect the life or the physical
                      integrity of you or a third party and we can't get consent
                      within a reasonable period of time, or the information
                      originates from a register provided for by Swiss law which
                      is accessible to the public or to persons with a
                      legitimate interest, provided that the legal conditions
                      for the consultation of such register has been met in the
                      specific case.
If Brazilian data protection law applies to the
                      processing of Service Data, you have certain rights,
                      including the rights to access, correct, delete or export
                      your Service Data, as well as to object to or request that
                      we restrict processing of Service Data. You also have the
                      right to object to the processing of Service Data or to
                      export Service Data to another service.
For users based in Brazil, the data controller
                      responsible for Service Data we collect for Google
                      Workspace and Google Workspace for Education is Google
                      LLC, and the data controller responsible for Service Data
                      we collect for Google Cloud Platform is Cloud Brasil
                      Computação e Serviços de Dados Ltda. The Data Protection Officer is Kristie
                      Chon Flynn. If you want to
                      exercise your data protection rights with regard to
                      Service Data we process in accordance with this Privacy
                      Notice and are not able to do so via the tools available
                      to you or your organization’s administrator, you can
                      always contact Google via our
Privacy Help Center
.
                      And you can contact your data protection authority if you
                      have concerns regarding your rights under Brazilian law.
In addition to the purposes and grounds described in this
                      Privacy Notice, we may process Service Data on the
                      following legal grounds:
Where necessary for the performance of a
                          contract with you
We may process your information where necessary for
                          us to enter into a contract with you or to comply with
                          our contractual commitments to you.
When we’re complying with legal
                          obligations
We’ll process your information when we have a legal
                          obligation to do so.
When we’re pursuing legitimate
                          interests
We may process Service Data based on our legitimate
                          interests and those of third parties while applying
                          appropriate safeguards that protect your privacy. This
                          means that we process your information in the
                          interests of providing Cloud Services you request;
                          making recommendations to optimize use of Cloud
                          Services; maintaining and improving Cloud Services;
                          providing and improving other services you request;
                          assisting you; and protecting against harm to the
                          rights, property or safety of Google, our users, our
                          customers, and the public, as required or permitted by
                          law.
Some U.S. state privacy laws require specific
                      disclosures.
These laws may include:
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA);
Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA);
Colorado Privacy Act (CPA);
Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and
                        Online Monitoring (CTDPA);
Utah Consumer Privacy Act (UCPA)
Florida Digital Bill of Rights (FDBR);
Texas Data Privacy and Security Act (TDPSA);
Oregon Consumer Privacy Act (OCPA); and
Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act (MTCDPA).
This Privacy Notice is designed to help you understand
                      how Google handles Service Data:
We explain the categories of Service Data Google
                          collects and the sources of that Service Data in
Service Data We Collect
.
We explain the purposes for which Google collects and
                          uses Service Data in
Why We Process Service Data
.
We explain when Google may disclose Service Data in
How We Share Service Data
.
                          Google does not sell your Service Data to any third
                          parties. Google also does not “share” your Service
                          Data as that term is defined in the California
                          Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA).
We explain how Google retains Service Data in
Retention and Deletion of Service Data
.
                          We maintain policies and technical measures to avoid
                          re-identifying that information.
U.S. state privacy laws also provide the right to request
                      information about how Google collects, uses, and discloses
                      Service Data. And they give you the right to access your
                      Service Data, sometimes in a portable format;
                      correct Service Data; and to request that Google delete
                      that Service Data. They also provide the right to not be
                      discriminated against for exercising these privacy rights.
We provide the information and tools described in
Access to Service Data
so you can exercise these rights. When you use them, we’ll
                      validate your request by verifying your identity (for
                      example, by confirming that you’re signed in to your
                      Google Account).
If you have questions or requests related to your rights
                      under U.S. state privacy laws, you (or your authorized
                      agent) can also
contact Google
.
                      And if you disagree with the decision on your request, you
                      can ask Google to reconsider it by responding to our
                      email.
Some U.S. state privacy laws require a description of
                      Service Data practices using specific categories. This
                      table uses these categories to organize the information in
                      this Privacy Notice.
Categories of Service Data we
                                collect
Business purposes for which Service Data
                                may be used or disclosed
Parties with whom Service Data may be
                                used or disclosed
Identifiers
and similar information
such
                                as your username, name, phone number, address,
                                and job titles, as well as unique identifiers
                                tied to the browser, application, or device
                                you’re using.
Demographic information,
such
                                as your preferred language and age.
Commercial
                                  information
such as records of
                                charges, payments, and billing details and
                                issues.
Technical and operational details
of
                                your usage of Cloud Services, such as
                                information about your usage, operational
                                status, software errors and crash reports,
                                authentication details, quality and performance
                                metrics, and other technical details necessary
                                for us to operate and maintain Cloud Services
                                and related software. This includes device
                                identifiers, identifiers from cookies or tokens,
                                and IP addresses.
Approximate location data,
as may be
                                determined by IP address, depending in part on
                                your device and account settings.
Audio, electronic, visual and similar
                                  information,
such as audio
                                recordings of your calls with our technical
                                support providers.
Inferences
drawn from the
                                above, like aggregated performance metrics for a
                                new product feature to determine product
                                strategy.
Protecting against security threats,
                                  abuse, and illegal
                                  activity.
Google uses and may
                                disclose Service Data to detect, prevent and
                                respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and for
                                protecting against other malicious, deceptive,
                                fraudulent, or illegal activity. For example, to
                                protect our services, Google may receive or
                                disclose information about IP addresses that
                                malicious actors have compromised.
Auditing and measurement.
Google uses Service Data for analytics and
                                measurement to understand how our services are
                                used, and to provide you and our customers with
                                recommendations and tips. We may disclose
                                non-personally identifiable information publicly
                                and with partners, including for auditing
                                purposes.
Maintaining our services.
Google uses Service Data to provide Cloud
                                Services and related technical support, and
                                other services you request, and ensure they are
                                working as intended, such as tracking outages or
                                troubleshooting bugs and other issues that you
                                report to us.
Product development.
Google
                                uses Service Data to improve Cloud Services and
                                other services you request, and to develop new
                                products, features and technologies that benefit
                                our users and customers.
Use of service
                                  providers.
Google shares Service
                                Data with service providers to perform services
                                on our behalf, in compliance with this Privacy
                                Notice and other appropriate confidentiality and
                                security measures. For example, we may rely on
                                service providers to help provide technical
                                support.
Legal reasons.
Google
                                also uses Service Data to satisfy applicable
                                laws or regulations, and discloses information
                                in response to legal process or enforceable
                                government requests, including to law
                                enforcement. We provide information about the
                                number and type of requests we receive from
                                governments in
                                our
Transparency Report
.
We do not disclose Service Data with companies,
                                organizations, or individuals outside of Google
                                except in the following cases:
When you procure third-party services.
We disclose Service Data outside of Google when
                                you or our customers choose(s) to procure a
                                third-party service through Google Cloud
                                Platform, the Google Cloud Platform Marketplace
                                or the Google Workspace Marketplace, or use a
                                third-party application that requests access to
                                your Service Data.
With your consent. We’ll disclose Service Data
                                outside of Google when we have obtained your
                                consent.
With your administrators and authorized
                                  resellers.
When you use Cloud
                                Services, your administrator and resellers
                                authorized to manage your or your organization’s
                                account will have access to certain Service
                                Data.
For external processing.
We disclose
                                Service Data with trusted third party providers
                                to process it for us as we instruct them and in
                                compliance with this Privacy Notice and
                                appropriate confidentiality and security
                                measures. In particular, we disclose Service
                                Data with our third party providers when you
                                request technical support services (we use the
                                information you provide in the support ticket)
                                and professional services (we use your contact
                                details to enable communication and
                                collaboration).
For legal reasons.
We disclose Service
                                Data outside of Google when we have a good-faith
                                belief that access to disclosure of that Service
                                Data is reasonably necessary to:
Comply with applicable law, regulation,
                                    legal process, or enforceable governmental
                                    request. We share information about the
                                    number and type of requests we receive from
                                    governments in
                                    our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable agreements, including
                                    investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address
                                    fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights,
                                    property or safety of Google, our customers,
                                    users, and the public as required or
                                    permitted by law.
More
Data protection laws in certain countries in this region may, in some cases,
                      require Google to obtain your consent to collect and process your Service
                      Data. By accessing and using any of the Cloud Services, you agree that Google
                      may process your Service Data in accordance with this Privacy Notice.
                      In particular, you can find information about:
The categories of Service Data Google collects and the sources of that
                        Service Data in
Service Data We Collect.
The purposes for which Google collects and uses Service Data in
Why We Process Service Data.
When Google may disclose Service Data in
How We Share Service Data.
How you can access Service Data relating to you in
Access to Service Data.
How Google retains Service Data in
Retention and Deletion of Service Data.
If Korean data protection law applies to the processing
                      of your Service Data, we provide the following additional
                      information for users of Cloud Services residing in Korea.
Items of personal information collected.
When you
                      use our Cloud Services, the following Service Data is
                      collected: (i) data you provide when creating an account
                      for Cloud Services or entering into a contract with us
                      (credentials, names, contact details, job titles, date of
                      birth and gender), (ii) business records of charges,
                      payments, billing details and issues; credit card info and
                      connecting info (iii) configuration and settings,
                      including resource identifiers and attributes, and service
                      and security settings, (iv) usage, operational status,
                      software errors and crash reports, authentication
                      credentials, quality and performance metrics, and other
                      technical details, device identifiers, identifiers from
                      cookies or tokens, and IP addresses), (v) your
                      communications and interactions with us and our partners,
                      and feedback, each as further described
here
.
The personal information listed in (i) to (v) above may
                      be transmitted to our
data centers
located abroad through our network, as described in
                      Purposes of collection and use of personal information
                      below and stored for the retention period described in
                      Retention period and deletion of personal information
                      below. If you do not want your personal information to be
                      transferred overseas, you may refrain from using services
                      and not provide your personal information. However,
                      services may not be provided or may be limited. If you
                      have any questions about this, please see the Contact
                      Information below.
We may use cookies (small text files placed on the user's
                      device) and similar technologies for a variety of
                      purposes, including user preferences or settings,
                      authentication information, or analysis. Most web browsers
                      accept cookies automatically, but provide controls that
                      allow you to block or delete cookies.
Purpose of collection and use of personal information.
Google collects and uses Service Data (i) to provide Cloud
                      Services you request, (ii) to make recommendations to
                      optimize use of Cloud Services, (iii) to maintain and
                      improve Cloud Services, (iv) to provide and improve other
                      services you request (v) to assist you, (vi) to protect
                      you, our users, customers, the public and Google, and
                      (vii) to comply with legal obligations, each as further
                      described
here
.
Retention period
and deletion
of
personal information.
We retain Service Data only for as long
                      as necessary to fulfill the purposes of collection and use described above.
                      For each type of data and operation, we set retention timeframes based on the
                      purpose for its collection, and ensure it is kept for no
                      longer than necessary.
If the retention period expires or you request deletion,
                      Google will faithfully endeavor to delete or anonymize such Service
                      Data unless there is a legal obligation that requires
                      processing or another lawful basis for retaining the
                      Service Data. When we receive a request to delete Service
                      Data, the retention period of the archive copy expires,
                      and then Google's archiving system has a mechanism to
                      overwrite the expired data.
We retain most types of Service Data for a set period of
                      up to 180 days (the exact number depends on the specific
                      type of data). However, we generally have longer
                      retention periods (which can be over a year) for Service
                      Data that is kept for (i) Security, fraud and abuse
                      prevention, (ii) complying with legal or regulatory
                      requirements including the Communications Secrets
                      Protection Act. We also have retention periods of a
                      minimum of five years for Service Data about payments and
                      billing information for complying with tax,
                      accounting or financial requirements, each as further
                      described
here
.
Consignment of personal information processing.
We
                      provide information to affiliates (listed
here
for Google Cloud Platform, and
here
for Google Workspace and Google Workspace for Education),
                      partners and other trusted businesses or persons to
                      process it for us, based on our instructions and in
                      compliance with this Privacy Notice and other appropriate
                      confidentiality and security measures.
Google has contracts with the third-party service
                      providers listed below to provide Cloud Services to Korean
                      residents. The contracts impose obligations on those
                      companies to prohibit the processing of Service Data other
                      than for the purposes we specify, to return or destroy
                      Service Data after the end of processing, and to implement
                      processes to ensure those companies comply with these
                      obligations.
Third-party vendor
(country of registration, contact
                                  information)
Role
Period, method of process/access, and items to
                              be processed/accessed
EPAM Systems Japan G.K.(Japan,
                                privacy@epam.com
)
Webhelp Malaysia Sdn. Bhd(Malaysia,
                                privacy@my.webhelp.com)
Infosys Limited.(Japan, privacy@infosys.com)
Customer Support for Cloud Services
In order for Google to provide Cloud Services
                                to Korean residents, these companies can process
                                the items of personal information collected
                                above remotely (excluding connecting info) from abroad during the
                                retention period described above depending on their roles
                                of customer support by accessing the personal
                                information from time to time via
                                telecommunication network.
If you do not want your personal information to
                                be transferred overseas, you may refrain from
                                using services and not provide your personal
                                information. However, Services may not be
                                provided or may be limited. If you have any
                                questions about this, please see the Contact
                                Information below.
Toss Payments Co., Ltd. (Korean Company)
Payment and notification services
Korea Mobile Certification Inc
(Korean Company)
Identity verification service
D-Agent (Korean company)
Local representative for user's privacy
                              inquiries
More
Legal minors.
Our basic policy for
                      Google Cloud Platform is not to collect personal
                      information of Korean residents under the age of 14. If
                      you are Korean residents under the age of 14, you may use
                      certain Cloud Services only with the consent of a parent
                      or legal representative.
Safety measures for personal information
. Google
                      takes the administrative, technical and physical measures
                      described in the "How We Secure Service Data" section
                      above to ensure the safety of Service Data.
Contact Information.
If you have any
                      questions about the Google Cloud Privacy Notice or privacy
                      practices, including how to exercise rights such as access to personal
                      information, correction/deletion, processing suspension, and withdrawal of
                      consent, please contact our Google privacy team (Email:
googlekrsupport@google.com
).
If you want to exercise your data protection rights with
                      regard to Service Data we process in accordance with this
                      Privacy Notice and are not able to do so via the tools
                      available to you or your organization’s administrator, you
                      can always contact Google via our
Privacy Help Center
.
                      And you can contact your local data protection authority
                      (
for instance,
Personal Information Infringement Report Center
)
                      if you have concerns regarding your rights under Korean
                      privacy law.
For local representatives under Personal Information
                      Protection Act and the Act on Promotion of Information and
                      Communication Network Utilization and Information
                      Protection, please see below:
Name and Representative: D-Agent Co., Ltd. (CEO
                        Byung-gun An)
Address and Contact Information: #1116, Platinum
                        Building, Gwanghwamun 28, Saemunan-ro 5-ga-gil,
                        Jongno-gu, Seoul, 02-737-0346, google_da_kr@dagent.co.kr
If Japanese data protection law (the Act on the
                      Protection of Personal Information, “APPI”) applies to the
                      processing of your Service Data, we provide the following
                      additional information for users of Cloud Services
                      residing in Japan.
Controller of Service Data.
Any Service Data
                      provided to or gathered by Google is controlled primarily
                      by Google LLC, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway
                      Mountain View, CA 94043 United States, representative is
                      Sundar Pichai, CEO.
Purpose of collection and use of personal information.
Google collects and uses Services Data for the purposes
                      set out
here
and
here
.
Measures undertaken to protect retained personal information.
Establishment of general policy
Google establishes and publishes this
Privacy Notice
outlining our general policy relating to Service Data.
Establishment of internal policy relating to handling of personal data
Google establishes internal policies about handling
                      measures and persons in charge and their responsibility
                      etc. with regard to the acquisition, utilization, records,
                      provision, deletion etc. of personal data.
Internal organization as security control action
Google has large security and privacy teams responsible
                      for developing, implementing, and reviewing internal
                      personal data handling processes. Google employees are
                      trained to report suspected incidents involving personal
                      data, which may be done through various channels such as
                      through dedicated email addresses or digital platforms. A
                      dedicated team assesses reported incidents, and as
                      appropriate a coordinated team is assigned to manage the
                      overall incident, including liaising with Legal and the
                      product team as part of the investigation and response.
                      The team on-call for an incident is assigned on a daily
                      rotation. Incident responses may follow either a standard
                      or an expedited route, depending on the severity and
                      priority assigned to the incident.
Personnel measures as security control action
Google conducts periodical training for its employees
                      about matters to consider when handling personal data.
Physical measures as security control action
Google takes measures to prevent unauthorized persons
                      from accessing personal data in any situation and to
                      prevent theft or loss of devices and electronic media for
                      handling personal data.
Technical measures as security control action
Please see
here
and
here
for further information on the security measures
                      undertaken to secure, retain and delete Service
                      Data
Research of external environment
Data protection laws vary among countries, with some
                      providing more protection than others. Google has
                      established a personal information protection system to
                      ensure your information is accorded protections equivalent
                      to APPI, as described in the
Privacy Notice
.
                      Regardless of where your information is processed, Google
                      applies the same personal information protection
                      measures globally. We also comply with certain legal
                      frameworks relating to the transfer of data, such as the
                      European frameworks. For more detail, please see
Data transfer frameworks
.
                      Further, with regard to the location of our data centers
                      storing Service Data, please see
here
.
                      There may be cases where Google entrusts the processing of
                      information to subprocessors or its subsidiaries or
                      affiliates. With regard to the location of Google’s
                      offices including subsidiaries and affiliates, please see
Google’s Office Locations
.
                      With regard to the location of subprocessors, please see
here
.
Contact information.
For any inquiries or
                      requests about your Service Data related rights under
                      applicable law, please email
appi-inquiries-external@google.com
.
We may update this Privacy Notice from time to time. We
                      will not make any significant changes without notifying
                      you in advance by posting a prominent notice on this page
                      describing the changes or by sending you a direct
                      communication. We encourage you to regularly review this
                      Privacy Notice, and we will always indicate the date the
                      last changes were published.
Previous versions
(Last modified February 6, 2025)
July 10, 2024
January 18, 2024
January 18, 2024
August 21, 2023
June 30, 2023
January 25, 2023
December 14, 2022
November 15, 2022
April 20, 2022
December 7, 2021
May 30, 2021
December 7, 2020
November 12, 2020
Sub-policy 3
https://beta.openai.com/policies/privacy-policy:
Waiting for beta.openai.com to respond...
Enable JavaScript and cookies to continue